Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-603
Chief of police; jurisdiction for service of process; bail.

The chief of police of a city of the metropolitan class shall be the principal ministerial officer of the city. His or her jurisdiction and that of his or her officers in the service of process in all criminal cases and in cases for the violation of city ordinances shall be coextensive with the county. The chief of police or his or her officers shall take bail in all bailable cases for the appearance before the county court of persons under arrest, but such bail shall be subject to the approval of the county court.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. V, § 3, p. 496;

C.S.1922, § 3684;

C.S.1929, § 14-603;

R.S.1943, § 14-603;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 97;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 216.
July 21, 2022
Jurisdiction of chief of police is restricted to county in which metropolitan city is located. Barton v. City of Omaha, 180 Neb. 752, 145 N.W.2d 444 (1966).